apertium-sme-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="leng/e__adj">
  <!-- todo wsd split lenger (lang) / lengre (lang) -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>re</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/å__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ærre</l>      <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærreste</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærrest</l>    <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /adjectives -->
	</pardefs>

<e lm="få">              <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lenge">           <i>leng</i><par n="leng/e__adj"/></e>
